Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2206
Bonds; negotiable instruments.

Whether or not the bonds are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under article 8, Uniform Commercial Code, the bonds shall be and hereby are made negotiable instruments within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8, Uniform Commercial Code, with the exception of any provisions thereof pertaining to registration.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 6, p. 1108.